Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-311 Notice to creditors and others.
(a) Unless the court otherwise directs, the liquidator shall give or cause to
be given notice of the liquidation order as soon as possible by:

(1) First class mail and by telegram, telephone, or
other electronic communication to the commissioner of each jurisdiction in
which the insurer is doing business;

(2) First class mail to any guaranty association or
foreign guaranty association who is or may become obligated as a result of the
liquidation;

(3) First class mail to all insurance producers of
the insurer;

(4) First class mail to all persons known or
reasonably expected to have claims against the insurer including all
policyholders, at their last known address as indicated by the records of the
insurer; and

(5) Publication in a newspaper of general circulation
in the county in which the insurer has its principal place of business and in
such other locations as the liquidator deems appropriate.

(b) Notice to potential claimants under
subsection (a) shall require claimants to file with the liquidator their claims
together with proper proofs thereof under section 431:15-326, on or before a
date the liquidator shall specify in the notice. The liquidator need not
require persons claiming cash surrender values or other investment values in
life insurance and annuities to file a claim. All claimants shall have a duty
to keep the liquidator informed of any changes of address.

(c) If notice is given in accordance with this
section, the distribution of assets of the insurer under this article shall be
conclusive with respect to all claimants, whether or not they received notice.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 155, §85; am L 2003, c 212, §109]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next